Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Life Insurers Contracts for
Funeral Services

§ 26-32-201.
Life insurers contracts for funeral services; rules.

A life insurer may contract or agree with any person, funeral director, mortuary or undertaker for the sole purpose of the funeral director, mortuary or undertaker conducting the funeral of any insured of the insurer.

The commissioner shall by rule regulate contracts authorized under this section.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 175, § 1.